Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 2. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

CHAPTER 21. GRANT PROGRAM FOR DISTRIBUTION OF SURPLUS AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS

Sec. 21.001. CREATION. The department by rule shall develop a program to award grants to nonprofit organizations for the purpose of collecting and distributing surplus agricultural products to food banks and other charitable organizations that serve needy or low-income individuals.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 49, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Agriculture Code Sec. 20.001 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(1), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 21.002. ELIGIBILITY. Subject to available funds, a nonprofit organization is eligible to receive a grant under this chapter if the organization:

(1) has at least five years of experience coordinating a statewide network of food banks and charitable organizations that serve each county of this state;

(2) operates a program that coordinates the collection and transportation of surplus agricultural products to a statewide network of food banks that provide food to needy or low-income individuals; and

(3) submits to the department, in the manner and time prescribed by the department, a proposal for the collection and distribution to food banks or other charitable organizations for use in providing food to needy or low-income individuals of surplus agricultural products, including:

(A) a description of the proposal;

(B) a schedule of projected costs for the proposal;

(C) measurable goals for the proposal; and

(D) a plan for evaluating the success of the proposal.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 49, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Agriculture Code Sec. 20.002 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(1), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 21.003. REPORT. A nonprofit organization that receives a grant under this chapter must report the results of the project to the department in the manner prescribed by the department.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 49, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Agriculture Code Sec. 20.003 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(1), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.